Hawaii statutes.
[§521-81] Change of locks; victims of
domestic violence. (a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c), if a tenant of
a dwelling unit or an immediate family member of the tenant has been the victim
of domestic violence and the tenant does not elect to be released from the
rental agreement pursuant to section 521-80, the tenant may require the
landlord to change the locks to the dwelling unit by submitting a request to
the landlord to do so.

(b) Within three days of the receipt of the
request in subsection (a), the landlord shall change the locks at the tenant's
expense. If the landlord fails to act within the three-day period, the tenant
may change the locks without the landlord's permission and shall give the
landlord a key to the new locks.

(c) If the person who committed domestic
violence against the tenant or immediate family member of the tenant is also a
party to the rental agreement, the locks shall not be changed unless there is a
court order requiring the person to vacate the dwelling unit and a copy of the
order has been furnished to the landlord.

(d) The tenant shall not be required to pay
any additional rent, fees, or security deposit because of the exclusion of the
person who committed domestic violence from the dwelling unit.

(e) The person who committed domestic violence
against the tenant or immediate family member of the tenant shall not be
entitled to any damages or other relief against the landlord or the tenant who
in good faith complies with this section. [L 2015, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next